Hawaii statutes.
[§651-93] Effect of separation, divorce,
reconciliation. Following the entry of a decree of separate maintenance or
an interlocutory decree of divorce, each spouse may claim a separate real
property exemption under this part as a person. A subsequent reconciliation of
the spouses when evidenced by a dismissal of the divorce action or vacation of
the decree of separate maintenance executed by both spouses or their attorneys
of record shall cancel a separate claim for a real property exemption and the spouses
shall only have one real property exemption. [L 1976, c 136, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next